Arkansas, session 2025, SB207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:


SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-9-103(a), concerning the requirements of
canvassers, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(7) A person acting as a canvasser shall not obtain a signature
for a petition without disclosing to the potential petitioner that petition
fraud is a criminal offense before the potential petitioner signs the
petition in the custody of the canvasser by:
(A) Verbal notification; or
(B) If verbal notification is impossible, written
notification with a document that is provided separately from all other
petition materials.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-103(c), concerning the penalty for
*SSS087*
02-20-2025 11:30:23 SSS087

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 SB207
falsification of materials related to signatures for an initiative or
referendum petition, is amended to read as follows:
(10) As a canvasser, fails to disclose to a potential petitioner
that petition fraud is a criminal offense before the potential petitioner
signs the petition in the custody of the canvasser as described under
subdivision (a)(7) of this section.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act
are declared to be severable and the invalidity of any provision of this act
shall not affect other provisions of the act which can be given effect
without the invalid provision.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the process for citizens to
propose initiated acts and amendments to the Arkansas Constitution is
critical to a well-functioning democracy in this state; that it is of the
utmost importance that the integrity of the initiative process be
strengthened through this act so that petitioners and voters maintain a high
degree of confidence in the soundness of their right to legislate as citizens
of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary because any delay in
the implementation of this act would disrupt the initiative process for the
2026 general election, which would have a detrimental effect on the public
peace, health, and safety of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the
public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/K. Hammer



02-20-2025 11:30:23 SSS087